Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.102

Loans secured, or not secured, by lien on real property—Licensee's obligations—Disclosure of fees and costs to borrower—Time limits.

(1) For all loans made by a licensee that are not secured by a lien on real property, the licensee must make disclosures in compliance with the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 1026, and all other applicable federal laws and regulations.

(2) For all loans made by a licensee that are secured by a lien on real property, the licensee must provide to each borrower within three business days following receipt of a loan application a written disclosure containing an itemized estimation and explanation of all fees and costs that the borrower is required to pay in connection with obtaining a loan from the licensee. A good faith estimate of a fee or cost must be provided if the exact amount of the fee or cost is not available when the disclosure is provided. Disclosure in a form which complies with the requirements of the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 1026, the real estate settlement procedures act and regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Part 1024, and all other applicable federal laws and regulations, as now or hereafter amended, constitutes compliance with this disclosure requirement. Each licensee must comply with all other applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

(3) In addition, for all loans made by the licensee that are secured by a lien on real property, the licensee must provide to the borrower an estimate of the annual percentage rate on the loan and a disclosure of whether or not the loan contains a prepayment penalty within three days of receipt of a loan application. The annual percentage rate must be calculated in compliance with the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 1024. If a licensee provides the borrower with a disclosure in compliance with the requirements of the truth in lending act within three business days of receipt of a loan application, then the licensee has complied with this subsection. If the director determines that the federal government has required a disclosure that substantially meets the objectives of this subsection, then the director may make a determination by rule that compliance with this federal disclosure requirement constitutes compliance with this subsection.

(4) In addition for all consumer loans made by the licensee that are secured by a lien on real property, the licensee must comply with RCW 19.144.020.

(5) In addition for all consumer loans made by a licensee that are a refinance of a federal student education loan, the licensee must provide to the borrower a clear and conspicuous disclosure that some repayment and forgiveness options available under federal student education loan programs, including without limitation income-driven repayment plans, economic hardship deferments, or public service loan forgiveness, will no longer be available to the borrower if he or she chooses to refinance federal student education loans with one or more consumer loans.

(6) The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

[ 2018 c 62 s 14; 2015 c 229 s 27; 2013 c 29 s 6; 2009 c 120 s 6; 2002 c 346 s 1; 2001 c 81 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.